Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB414.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1338(e) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1338. Person with disability plate and placard.* * *(c.3) Placard issuance by legislative district offices and authorized organizations.--Upon request by a legislative district office or an authorized organization, the department shall permit the legislative district office or authorized organization to issue temporary disability parking placards directly to individuals according to the following:(1) The department shall supply the legislative district office or authorized organization with training and materials 123456789101112131415161718 related to issuing, storing, ordering and returning temporary disability parking placards.(2) A temporary disability parking placard may be issued upon application by an individual to the legislative district office or authorized organization according to the following:(i) The department shall prescribe the form of the application.(ii) The application must include a statement signed by the individual asserting that the individual meets the qualifications of subsection (a).(3) The legislative district office or authorized organization shall electronically submit a copy of the completed application under this subsection, with a health care provider's statement or a statement from a police officer that the individual is disabled in accordance with subsection (c), to the department to enable the department to update its records to reflect the issuance of the temporary disability parking placard.(4) A temporary disability parking placard issued by a legislative district office or authorized organization shall be valid for a period of not more than six months.(5) An authorized organization may not charge a fee to members or nonmembers for issuing a temporary disability parking placard directly to individuals, except for actual postage incurred, if any.* * *(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Authorized organization." A nationally recognized 20250SB0414PN0367 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonprofit, not-for-profit or private business authorized as an online messenger with the department.* * *"Legislative district office." A district office of a member of the Senate or House of Representatives.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB0414PN0367 - 3 - 1234567